Utah statutes.
17C-2-108.   Notice of urban renewal project area plan adoption -- Effective date of plan -- Contesting the formation of the plan.

(1) (a)  Upon the community legislative body's adoption of an urban renewal project area plan, or an amendment to a project area plan under Section 17C-2-110, the legislative body shall provide notice as provided in Subsection (1)(b) by:

(i) (A)  publishing or causing to be published a notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the agency's boundaries; or

(B)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the agency's boundaries, causing a notice to be posted in at least three public places within the agency's boundaries; and

(ii)  posting a notice on the Utah Public Notice Website described in Section 63F-1-701.

(b)  Each notice under Subsection (1)(a) shall:

(i)  set forth the community legislative body's ordinance adopting the project area plan or a summary of the ordinance; and

(ii)  include a statement that the project area plan is available for general public inspection and the hours for inspection.

(2)  The project area plan shall become effective on the date of:

(a)  if notice was published under Subsection (1)(a), publication of the notice; or

(b)  if notice was posted under Subsection (1)(a), posting of the notice.

(3) (a)  For a period of 30 days after the effective date of the project area plan under Subsection (2), any person in interest may contest the project area plan or the procedure used to adopt the project area plan if the plan or procedure fails to comply with applicable statutory requirements.

(b)  After the 30-day period under Subsection (3)(a) expires, no person may contest the project area plan or procedure used to adopt the project area plan for any cause.

(4)  Upon adoption of the project area plan by the community's legislative body, the agency may carry out the project area plan.

(5)  Each agency shall make the adopted project area plan available to the general public at its offices during normal business hours.

